Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2339.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702(c)(27) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2702. Aggravated assault.* * *(c) Officers, employees, etc., enumerated.--The officers, agents, employees and other persons referred to in subsection (a) shall be as follows:* * *(27) A teaching staff member, a school board member or other employee, including a student employee, of any elementary or secondary publicly funded educational institution, any elementary or secondary private school 1234567891011121314151617 licensed by the Department of Education or any elementary or secondary parochial school while acting in the scope of his or her employment or because of his or her employment relationship to the school. This paragraph includes a school crossing guard of a school district or local police department, while acting in the scope of the individual's employment or because of the individual's employment relationship to the school.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2339PN3113 - 2 - 12345678910